District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Ranked Choice Voting Implementation Clarification Temporary
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 8a of the District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, effective March 7,
2025 (69 Stat. 699; D.C. Official Code § § 1-1001.08a), is amended by striking the phrase “June
2026 primary election” and inserting the phrase “first election held after January 1, 2027” in its
place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as


provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.